South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3745.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 2 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 2-1-60.  (A) No person is eligible for election to the House of Representatives if that person has served six terms in the same body, regardless of the district represented. (B) No person is eligible for election to the Senate if that person has served four terms in the same body, regardless of the district represented. (C) For purposes of this section, any term served, for which the election was held prior to January 1, 2024, must not be counted as a term served. (D) For purpose of this section, service in office for more than one half of a term must be deemed service for a term. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----